Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.15
Established place of business,
defined.

(1)
Established place of business means a permanent location within this state,
easily accessible to the public, owned or leased by the applicant or a licensee
for at least the term of the license year, and conforming with applicable
zoning laws, at which the licensee conducts the business for which he or she
is licensed and may be contacted by the public during posted reasonable business
hours which shall be not less than forty hours per week.

(2) The established
place of business shall have the following facilities:

(a) Office space
in a building or mobile home, which space shall be clean, dry, safe, and well
lighted and in which shall be kept and maintained all books, records, and
files necessary for the conduct of the licensed business, which premises,
books, records, and files shall be available for inspection during regular
business hours by any peace officer or investigator employed or designated
by the board. Dealers shall, upon demand of the board's investigator, furnish
copies of records so required when conducting any investigation of a complaint;

(b) A sound and
well-maintained sign which is legible from a public road and displayed with
letters not less than eight inches in height and one contiguous area to display
ten or more motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers in a presentable manner;

(c) Adequate repair
facilities and tools to properly and actually service warranties on motor
vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers sold at such place of business and to make
other repairs arising out of the conduct of the licensee's business or, in
lieu of such repair facilities, the licensee may enter into a contract for
the provision of such service and file a copy thereof annually with the board
and shall furnish to each buyer a written statement as to where such service
will be provided as required by section 60-1417. The service facility shall
be located in the same county as the licensee unless the board specifically
authorizes the facility to be located elsewhere. Such facility shall maintain
regular business hours and shall have suitable repair equipment and facilities
to service and inspect the type of vehicles sold by the licensee. Investigators
of the board may certify ongoing compliance with the service and inspection
facilities or repair facilities; and

(d) An operating telephone connected with a public
telephone exchange and located on the premises of the established place of
business with a telephone number listed by the public telephone exchange and
available to the public during the required posted business hours.

(3) A mobile truck
equipped with repair facilities to properly perform warranty functions and
other repairs shall be deemed adequate repair facilities for trailers.

(4) The requirements
of this section shall apply to the place of business authorized under a supplemental
motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer dealer's license.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 27.